dev/apertium-swe.pre-saldo-swe.dix
<pardef n="l/igga__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>igga</l>      <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igger</l>     <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iggs</l>      <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åg</l>        <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>egat</l>      <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igg</l>       <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iggande</l>   <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>       <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agda</l>      <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="när/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hör/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/imma__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>imma</l>      <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immar</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immas</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immade</l>    <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>am</l>        <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immat</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ummit</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imma</l>      <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immande</l>   <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immad</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immat</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immade</l>    <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ummen</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ummet</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>umna</l>      <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="spr/inga__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>inga</l>      <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inger</l>     <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ings</l>      <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>inges</l>     <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>       <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungit</l>     <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingande</l>   <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungen</l>     <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unget</l>     <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungna</l>     <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="br/inna__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>inna</l>      <r>inna<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inner</l>     <r>inna<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inns</l>      <r>inna<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ann</l>       <r>inna<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnit</l>     <r>inna<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inn</l>       <r>inna<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>innande</l>   <r>inna<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnen</l>     <r>inna<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnet</l>     <r>inna<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unna</l>      <r>inna<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="begr/ipa__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ipa</l>       <r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iper</l>      <r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ips</l>       <r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ipes</l>      <r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ep</l>        <r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ipit</l>      <r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ip</l>        <r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ipande</l>    <r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ipen</l>      <r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ipet</l>      <r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ipa</l>       <r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="begripa">         <i>begr</i><par n="begr/ipa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brinna">          <i>br</i><par n="br/inna__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vinna">           <i>v</i><par n="br/inna__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ligga">           <i>l</i><par n="l/igga__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="simma">           <i>s</i><par n="s/imma__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="springa">         <i>spr</i><par n="spr/inga__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nära">            <i>när</i><par n="när/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="höra">            <i>hör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förhöra">         <i>förhör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="genomföra">       <i>genomför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="föra">            <i>för</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="röra">            <i>rör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utföra">          <i>utför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="medföra">         <i>medför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="framföra">        <i>framför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uppföra">         <i>uppför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillföra">        <i>tillför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slutföra">        <i>slutför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bokföra">         <i>bokför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="återinföra">      <i>återinför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="provköra">        <i>provkör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="saluföra">        <i>saluför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="upphöra">         <i>upphör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="överföra">        <i>överför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förföra">         <i>förför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="testköra">        <i>testkör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vidrör">          <i>vidrör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="folkbokföra">     <i>folkbokför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="busköra">         <i>buskör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avföra">          <i>avför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beröra">          <i>berör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förstöra">        <i>förstör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fylleköra">       <i>fyllekör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="införa">          <i>inför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jämföra">         <i>jämför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="korsförhöra">     <i>korsförhör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vilseföra">       <i>vilseför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillhöra">        <i>tillhör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lagerföra">       <i>lagerför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inbegripa" a="is"><i>inbegr</i><par n="begr/ipa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="föregripa" a="is"><i>föregr</i><par n="begr/ipa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillgripa" a="is"><i>tillgr</i><par n="begr/ipa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="återvinna" a="is"><i>återv</i><par n="br/inna__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ingripa" a="is">  <i>ingr</i><par n="begr/ipa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gripa" a="is">    <i>gr</i><par n="begr/ipa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="försvinna" a="is"><i>försv</i><par n="br/inna__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="köra" a="is">     <i>kör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hinna" a="is">    <i>h</i><par n="br/inna__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hänföra" a="is">  <i>hänför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="angripa" a="is">  <i>angr</i><par n="begr/ipa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sammanföra" a="is"><i>sammanför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="övervinna" a="is"><i>överv</i><par n="br/inna__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="styra" a="is">    <i>styr</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="störa" a="is">    <i>stör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="föreligga" a="is"><i>förel</i><par n="l/igga__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="begära" a="is">   <i>begär</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="härröra" a="is">  <i>härrör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="röra om" a="is">  <i>rör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/><p><l><b/>om</l><r><g><b/>om</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="hyra" a="is">     <i>hyr</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fylla" a="PT">              <i>fyll</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slänga" a="PT">              <i>släng</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kräva" a="PT">              <i>kräv</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hårdföra"><i>hårdför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
